Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.220

Branch office—Qualified bail bond agent as manager.

A branch office may not operate under a business name other than the name of the principal bail bond agency and must have a qualified bail bond agent as manager of the office. The qualified agent shall comply with the provisions of RCW 18.185.100.

[ 1996 c 242 s 2.]